Washington statutes.
RCW 41.59.920

Construction of chapter—Employee's rights preserved.

Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, nothing contained in this chapter shall be construed to deny or otherwise abridge any rights, privileges or benefits granted by law to employees.

[ 1975 1st ex.s. c 288 s 20.]